Virginia statutes. Title 37.2. Behavioral Health and Developmental Services.
Chapter 5. Community Services Boards.
§ 37.2-506.
Background checks required.

As used in this section:“Direct care position” means any position that includes responsibility for (i) treatment, case management, health, safety, development, or well-being of an individual receiving services or (ii) immediately supervising a person in a position with this responsibility.“Hire for compensated employment” does not include (i) a promotion from one adult substance abuse or adult mental health treatment position to another such position within the same community services board or (ii) new employment in an adult substance abuse or adult mental health treatment position in another office or program of the same community services board if the person employed prior to July 1, 1999, had no convictions in the five years prior to the application date for employment. “Hire for compensated employment” includes (a) a promotion or transfer from an adult substance abuse treatment position to any mental health or developmental services direct care position within the same community services board or (b) new employment in any mental health or developmental services direct care position in another office or program of the same community services board for which the person has previously worked in an adult substance abuse treatment position.“Shared living” means an arrangement in which the Commonwealth’s program of medical assistance pays a portion of a person’s rent, utilities, and food expenses in return for the person residing with and providing companionship, support, and other limited, basic assistance to a person with developmental disabilities receiving medical assistance services in accordance with a waiver for whom he has no legal responsibility.

Every community services board shall require (i) any applicant who accepts employment in any direct care position with the community services board, (ii) any applicant for approval as a sponsored residential service provider, (iii) any adult living in the home of an applicant for approval as a sponsored residential service provider, (iv) any person employed by a sponsored residential service provider to provide services in the home, (v) any person who enters into a shared living arrangement with a person receiving medical assistance services pursuant to a waiver, and (vi) any person under contract to serve in a direct care position on behalf of the community services board to submit to fingerprinting and provide personal descriptive information to be forwarded through the Central Criminal Records Exchange to the Federal Bureau of Investigation (FBI) for the purpose of obtaining national criminal history record information regarding the applicant. Except as otherwise provided in subsection C, D, or F, no community services board shall hire for compensated employment, approve as a sponsored residential service provider, permit to enter into a shared living arrangement with a person receiving medical assistance services pursuant to a waiver, or permit any person under contract to serve in a direct care position on behalf of the community services board persons who have been convicted of (a) any offense set forth in clause (i), (ii), or (iii) of the definition of barrier crime in §

19.2-392.02

or (b) any offense set forth in clause (iv) of the definition of barrier crime in §

19.2-392.02

(1) in the five years prior to the application date for employment, the application date to be a sponsored residential service provider, or entering into a shared living arrangement or (2) if such person continues on probation or parole or has failed to pay required court costs for such offense set forth in clause (iv) of the definition of barrier crime in §

19.2-392.02

.The Central Criminal Records Exchange, upon receipt of an applicant’s record or notification that no record exists, shall submit a report to the requesting executive director or personnel director of the community services board. If any applicant is denied employment because of information appearing on his criminal history record and the applicant disputes the information upon which the denial was based, the Central Criminal Records Exchange shall, upon written request, furnish to the applicant the procedures for obtaining a copy of the criminal history record from the FBI. The information provided to the executive director or personnel director of any community services board shall not be disseminated except as provided in this section.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection B, the community services board may hire for compensated employment or permit any person under contract to serve in a direct care position on behalf of the community services board or permit any person employed by a temporary agency that has entered into a contract with the community services board to provide direct care services on behalf of the community services board at adult substance abuse or adult mental health treatment programs a person who was convicted of any violation of §

18.2-51.3

; any misdemeanor violation of §

18.2-56

or

18.2-56.1

, subsection A of §

18.2-57

, or §

18.2-57

.2; any violation of §

18.2-60

,

18.2-89

,

18.2-92

, or

18.2-94

; any misdemeanor violation of §

18.2-282

,

18.2-346

, or

18.2-346.01

; any offense set forth in clause (iii) of the definition of barrier crime in §

19.2-392.02

, except an offense pursuant to subsection H1 or H2 of §

18.2-248

; or any substantially similar offense under the laws of another jurisdiction, if the hiring community services board determines, based upon a screening assessment, that the criminal behavior was substantially related to the applicant’s substance abuse or mental illness and that the person has been successfully rehabilitated and is not a risk to individuals receiving services based on his criminal history background and his substance abuse or mental illness history.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection B, the community services board may hire for compensated employment or permit any person under contract to serve in a direct care position on behalf of the community services board or permit any person employed by a temporary agency that has entered into a contract with the community services board to provide direct care services on behalf of the community services board at adult substance abuse treatment programs a person who has been convicted of not more than one offense under subsection C of §

18.2-57

, or any substantially similar offense under the laws of another jurisdiction, if (i) the person has been granted a simple pardon if the offense was a felony committed in Virginia, or the equivalent if the person was convicted under the laws of another jurisdiction; (ii) more than 10 years have elapsed since the conviction; and (iii) the hiring community services board determines, based upon a screening assessment, that the criminal behavior was substantially related to the applicant’s substance abuse and that the person has been successfully rehabilitated and is not a risk to individuals receiving services based on his criminal history background and his substance abuse history.

The community services board and a screening contractor designated by the Department shall screen applicants who meet the criteria set forth in subsections C and D to assess whether the applicants have been rehabilitated successfully and are not a risk to individuals receiving services based on their criminal history backgrounds and substance abuse or mental illness histories. To be eligible for such screening, the applicant shall have completed all prison or jail terms, shall not be under probation or parole supervision, shall have no pending charges in any locality, shall have paid all fines, restitution, and court costs for any prior convictions, and shall have been free of parole or probation for at least five years for all convictions. In addition to any supplementary information the community services board or screening contractor may require or the applicant may wish to present, the applicant shall provide to the screening contractor a statement from his most recent probation or parole officer, if any, outlining his period of supervision and a copy of any pre-sentencing or post-sentencing report in connection with the felony conviction. The cost of this screening shall be paid by the applicant, unless the board decides to pay the cost.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection B, a community services board may (i) hire for compensated employment, (ii) approve as a sponsored residential service provider, (iii) permit to enter into a shared living arrangement, or (iv) permit any person under contract to serve in a direct care position on behalf of the community services board or permit any person employed by a temporary agency that has entered into a contract with the community services board to provide direct care services on behalf of the community services board persons who have been convicted of not more than one misdemeanor offense under §

18.2-57

or

18.2-57.2

, or any substantially similar offense under the laws of another jurisdiction, if 10 years have elapsed following the conviction, unless the person committed the offense while employed in a direct care position. A community services board may also approve a person as a sponsored residential service provider if (a) any adult living in the home of an applicant or (b) any person employed by the applicant to provide services in the home in which sponsored residential services are provided has been convicted of not more than one misdemeanor offense under §

18.2-57

or

18.2-57.2

, or any substantially similar offense under the laws of another jurisdiction, if 10 years have elapsed following the conviction, unless the person committed the offense while employed in a direct care position.

Community services boards also shall require, as a condition of employment, approval as a sponsored residential service provider, permission to enter into a shared living arrangement with a person receiving medical assistance services pursuant to a waiver, or permission for any person under contract to serve in a direct care position on behalf of the community services board, written consent and personal information necessary to obtain a search of the registry of founded complaints of child abuse and neglect that is maintained by the Department of Social Services pursuant to §

63.2-1515

.

The cost of obtaining the criminal history record and search of the child abuse and neglect registry record shall be borne by the applicant, unless the community services board decides to pay the cost.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a community services board that provides services to individuals receiving services under the state plan for medical assistance services or any waiver thereto may disclose to the Department of Medical Assistance Services (i) whether a criminal history background check has been completed for a person described in subsection B for whom a criminal history background check is required and (ii) whether the person described in subsection B is eligible for employment, to provide sponsored residential services, to provide services in the home of a sponsored residential service provider, or to enter into a shared living arrangement with a person receiving medical assistance services pursuant to a waiver.

A person who complies in good faith with the provisions of this section shall not be liable for any civil damages for any act or omission in the performance of duties under this section unless the act or omission was the result of gross negligence or willful misconduct.

Any person employed by a temporary agency that has entered into a contract with a community services board and who will serve in a direct care position on behalf of the community services board shall undergo a background check that shall include:

A criminal history records check through the Central Criminal Records Exchange pursuant to §

19.2-389

; and

A search of the central registry maintained pursuant to §

63.2-1515

for any founded complaint of child abuse and neglect.Except as otherwise provided in subsection C, D, or F, no community services board shall permit any person employed by a temporary agency that has entered into a contract with the community services board to provide direct care services on behalf of the community services board if that person has been convicted of (i) any offense set forth in clause (i), (ii), or (iii) of the definition of barrier crime in §

19.2-392.02

or (ii) any offense set forth in clause (iv) of the definition of barrier crime in §

19.2-392.02

(a) in the five years prior to the application date for employment, the application date to be a sponsored residential service provider, or entering into a shared living arrangement or (b) if such person continues on probation or parole or has failed to pay required court costs for such offense set forth in clause (iv) of the definition of barrier crime in §

19.2-392.02

.

History.

1997, c. 743, § 37.1-197.2; 1998, cc. 130, 680, 882; 1999, c. 685; 2001, c. 784; 2002, c. 712; 2003, c. 468; 2005, c. 716; 2008, cc. 383, 407; 2011, c. 657; 2012, cc. 476, 507; 2016, c. 574; 2017, cc. 458, 775, 809; 2018, c. 569; 2019, c. 89; 2020, c. 1092; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 188, 475.

Cross references.

As to licensed provider statement to prospective employer, see § 32.1-326.4.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendments by cc. 383 and 407 are nearly identical, and in subsection C, deleted “or” preceding “(ii),” inserted “or (iii) assault and battery, as set out in subsection A of §

18.2-57

,” and inserted “or mental illness” twice and once in subsection D; inserted “or adult mental health” throughout the section. In addition, c. 407 inserted “or (iv) assault and battery against a family or household member, as set out in subsection A of §

18.2-57

.2” in subsection C.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendment by c. 657, in the first paragraph in subsection B, substituted “subsection C, D, or F” for “subsections C or E”; made a minor stylistic change in subsection C; added subsection D; redesignated former subsection D as subsection E, and therein substituted “subsections C and D” for “subsection C”; and redesignated the remaining subsections accordingly.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 476 and 507 are identical, substituted “direct care position” for “direct consumer care position” throughout the section; and in subsection A, substituted “an individual receiving services” for “a consumer” in the first paragraph, and “developmental services” for “mental retardation” in (a) and (b) of the second paragraph; substituted “an applicant’s record” for “an individual’s record” in the first sentence, and “on his criminal history” for “on the criminal history” in the second sentence, of the second paragraph of subsection B; and substituted “individuals receiving services” for “consumers” near the end of subsections C and D and in the first sentence of subsection E.

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendment by c. 574, in subsection A, divided the former first paragraph into the introductory language of subsection A and the definition for “Direct,” deleted “As used in this section” twice in the second paragraph, added the definition for “Shared living”; in subsection B, inserted the clause (i) designation, added clauses (ii)-(v) and inserted “approve as a sponsored residential service provider, or permit to enter into a shared living arrangement with a person receiving medical assistance services pursuant to a waiver”;
and substituted “approval as a sponsored residential service provider, or permission to enter into a shared living arrangement with a person receiving medical assistance services pursuant to a waiver” for “for all applicant” in subsection G.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 458, in subsection A, deleted “intellectual or” preceding “developmental disabilities” in the definition of “Shared living.”

The 2017 amendment by c. 775, in subsection F, in the first sentence, inserted the clause (i) designation, inserted “(ii) approve as a sponsored residential service provider, or (iii) permit to enter into a shared living arrangement,” and added the second sentence.

The 2017 amendment by c. 809, in subsection B, substituted clauses (a) and (b) for “any offense listed in subsection B of §

37.2-314

” at the end of the first paragraph; rewrote subsection C; in subsection D, substituted “under subsection C of §

18.2-57

, or any substantially similar offense under the laws of another jurisdiction” for “of assault and battery of a law-enforcement officer under §

18.2-57

, or an equivalent offense in another state” and “person was convicted under the laws of another jurisdiction” for “offense was committed in another state”; and inserted “or any substantially similar offense under the laws of another jurisdiction” in subsection F.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendment by c. 569 inserted “18.2-89” in subsection C.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 89 added subsection I and redesignated former subsection I as subsection J.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 1092, inserted “if” at the beginning of clause (iv)(2) in the second sentence of the first paragraph in subsection B; in subsection C, inserted “any misdemeanor violation of §

18.2-282

or

18.2-346

,” and made a stylistic change.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 188, effective July 1, 2021, substituted “18.2-346, or

18.2-346.01

” for “or

18.2-346

” in subsection C.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 475, effective July 1, 2021, in subsection B, inserted “and (vi) any person under contract to serve in a direct care position on behalf of the community services board” and “or permit any person under contract to serve in a direct care position on behalf of the community services board” in the first paragraph; in subsections C and D, inserted “or permit any person under contract to serve in a direct care position on behalf of the community services board or permit any person employed by a temporary agency that has entered into a contract with the community services board to provide direct care services on behalf of the community services board” and inserted similar language in clause (iv) of subsection F; inserted “or permission for any person under contract to serve in a direct care position on behalf of the community services board” in subsection G; added subsection K and the last paragraph in the section; and made stylistic changes.

§ 37.2-507.
Data collection on children and adolescents.

Every community services board shall submit to the Department information on children under the age of 14 and adolescents ages 14 through 17 for whom admission to an inpatient acute care psychiatric or residential treatment facility licensed pursuant to Article 2 (§

37.2-403

et seq.) of Chapter 4 of this title, excluding group homes, was sought but was unable to be obtained by the board. Information to be submitted shall include:

The child or adolescent’s date of birth;

Date admission was attempted; and

Reason the child or adolescent could not be admitted to the facility.

History.

2002, cc. 585, 619, § 37.1-197.3; 2005, c. 716.

§ 37.2-508.
Performance contract for mental health, developmental, and substance abuse services.

The Department shall develop and initiate negotiation of the performance contracts through which it provides funds to community services boards to accomplish the purposes set forth in this chapter. In the case of operating boards, the Department may, notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, disburse state and federal funds appropriated to it for mental health, developmental, or substance abuse services directly to the operating board, when that operating board is authorized by the governing body of each city or county that established it to receive such funds. Six months prior to the end of an existing contract or, if no contract exists, six months prior to the beginning of each fiscal year, the Department shall make available to the public the standard performance contract form that it intends to use as the performance contract for that fiscal year and solicit public comments for a period of 60 days. Such contracts shall be for a fixed term and shall provide for annual renewal by the Board if the term exceeds one year.

Any community services board may apply for the assistance provided in this chapter by submitting to the Department its proposed performance contract together with (i) the approval of its board of directors for operating and administrative policy boards or the comments of the local government department’s policy-advisory board and (ii) the approval of the contract by formal vote of the governing body of each city or county that established it. The community services board shall make its proposed performance contract available for public review and solicit public comments for a period of 30 days prior to submitting its proposed contract for the approval of its board of directors for operating and administrative policy boards or the comments of the local government department’s policy-advisory board. To avoid disruptions in service continuity and allow sufficient time to complete public review and comment about the contract and negotiation and approval of the contract, the Department may provide semi-monthly payments of state-controlled funds to the community services board. If the governing body of each city or county does not approve the proposed performance contract by September 30 of each year, the performance contract shall be deemed approved or renewed.

The performance contract shall (i) delineate the responsibilities of the Department and the community services board; (ii) specify conditions that must be met for the receipt of state-controlled funds; (iii) identify the groups of individuals to be served with state-controlled funds; (iv) contain specific outcome measures for individuals receiving services, provider performance measures, satisfaction measures for individuals receiving services, and participation and involvement measures for individuals receiving services and their family members; (v) contain mechanisms that have been identified or developed jointly by the Department and community services board and that will be employed collaboratively by the community services board and the state hospital to manage the utilization of state hospital beds; (vi) establish an enforcement mechanism, should a community services board fail to be in substantial compliance with its performance contract, including notice and appeal processes and provisions for remediation, withholding or reducing funds, methods of repayment of funds, and the Department’s exercise of the provisions of subsection E; and (vii) include reporting requirements and information about revenues, costs, services, and individuals receiving services displayed in a consistent, comparable format determined by the Department.The Department may provide for performance monitoring in order to determine whether the community services boards are in substantial compliance with their performance contracts.

No community services board shall be eligible to receive state-controlled funds for mental health, developmental, or substance abuse services after September 30 of each year unless (i) its performance contract has been approved or renewed by the governing body of each city or county that established it and by the Department; (ii) it provides service, cost, and revenue data and information and aggregate and individual data and information about individuals receiving services, notwithstanding the provisions of §

37.2-400

or any regulations adopted thereunder, to the Department in the format prescribed by the Department; and (iii) it uses standardized cost accounting and financial management practices approved by the Department.

If, after unsuccessful use of a remediation process described in the performance contract, a community services board remains in substantial noncompliance with its performance contract with the Department, the Department may, after affording the community services board an adequate opportunity to use the appeal process described in the performance contract, terminate all or a portion of the contract. Using the state-controlled resources associated with that contract, the Department, after consulting with the governing body of each city or county that established the board, may negotiate a performance contract with another board, a behavioral health authority, or a private nonprofit or for-profit organization or organizations to obtain services that were the subject of the terminated performance contract.

History.

1968, c. 477, § 37.1-198; 1970, c. 346; 1972, c. 498; 1976, c. 671; 1980, c. 582; 1986, c. 176; 1998, c. 680; 2005, cc. 75, 716; 2012, cc. 476, 507, 805, 836.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2005, c. 75 amended former § 37.1-198, from which this section is derived.
Pursuant to § 30-152 and Acts 2005, c. 716, cl. 5, the 2005 amendment to this section by c. 75, has been given effect in this section as set out above by adding the second sentence in subsection A.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 476 and 507 are identical, and substituted “developmental” for “mental retardation” in the second sentence of subsection A; in subsection C, substituted “individuals” for “consumers” in clause (iii); rewrote clause (iv), which read “contain specific consumer outcome, provider performance, consumer satisfaction, and consumer and family member participation and involvement measures”; in clause (vii), substituted “information about revenues, costs, services, and individuals receiving services” for “revenue, cost, service, and consumer information”; in subsection D, substituted “developmental” for “mental retardation” and substituted “and revenue data and information and aggregate and individual data and information about individuals receiving services” for “revenue, and aggregate and individual consumer data and information” in clause (ii).

The 2012 amendments by cc. 805 and 836 are identical, and, in subsection A, inserted “end of an existing contract or, if no contract exists, six months prior to the” in the third sentence, and added the last sentence; in subsection B, deleted “annually” following “submitting” and “for the next fiscal year” following “performance contract” in the first sentence, deleted “up to six” following “the Department may provide” in the third sentence, and added “or renewed” at the end of the last sentence; and inserted “or renewed” following “approved” in D (i).

§ 37.2-509.
Mental health, developmental, and substance abuse services; allocation of funds by Department; reduction of funds.

At the beginning of each fiscal year, the Department shall allocate available state-controlled funds to community services boards for disbursement in accordance with procedures established by the Department and performance contracts approved by the Department. Allocations of state-controlled funds to each community services board shall be determined by the Department, after careful consideration of all of the following factors:

The total amounts of state-controlled funds appropriated for this purpose;

Previous allocations of state-controlled funds to each community services board;

Requirements or conditions attached to appropriations of state-controlled funds by the General Assembly, the Governor, or federal granting authorities;

Community services board input about the uses of and methodologies for allocating existing and new state-controlled funds; and

Other relevant and appropriate considerations.Allocations to any community services board for operating expenses, including salaries and other costs, or the construction of facilities shall not exceed 90 percent of the total amount of state and local matching funds provided for these expenses or such construction, unless a waiver is granted by the Department pursuant to policy adopted by the Board.

The Department shall notify the governing body of each city or county that established the community services board before implementing any reduction of state-controlled funds. Before any city or county reduces local government matching funds, it shall notify its community services board and the Department.

All fees collected by the community services board shall be included in its performance contract and retained and used by the board for mental health, developmental, and substance abuse services purposes.

History.

1968, c. 477, § 37.1-199; 1972, c. 629; 1974, c. 273; 1976, c. 671; 1977, cc. 88, 351; 1980, c. 582; 1985, c. 309; 1998, c. 680; 2005, c. 716; 2012, cc. 476, 507.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 476 and 507 are identical, and substituted “developmental” for “mental retardation” and inserted “services” preceding “purposes” in subsection C.

§ 37.2-510.
Community services board; withdrawal of county or city.

No county or city participating in a joint community services board shall withdraw from it without providing two years’ notice to the other participating counties or cities, unless the other counties or cities agree to an earlier withdrawal.

History.

1968, c. 477, § 37.1-200; 1970, c. 346; 1972, c. 629; 1980, c. 582; 2005, c. 716.

§ 37.2-511.
Liability for expenses of services.

The income and estate of an individual receiving services shall be liable for the expenses of services under the jurisdiction or supervision of any community services board that are utilized by the individual. Any person responsible for holding, managing, or controlling the income and estate of the individual shall apply the income and estate toward the expenses of the services utilized by the individual.

Any person responsible for the support of an individual receiving services pursuant to §

20-61

or a common law duty to support shall be liable for the expenses of services under the jurisdiction or supervision of any community services board that are utilized by the individual, unless the individual, regardless of age, qualifies for and is receiving aid under a federal or state program of assistance to the blind or disabled. Any such person shall no longer be financially liable, however, when a cumulative total of 1,826 days of (i) care and treatment or training for the individual in a state facility, (ii) utilization by the individual of services under the jurisdiction or supervision of any community services board, or (iii) a combination of (i) and (ii) has passed and payment for or a written agreement to pay the charges for 1,826 days of care and services has been made. Not less than three hours of service per day shall be required to include one day in the cumulative total of 1,826 days of utilization of services under the jurisdiction or supervision of any community services board. In order to claim this exemption, the person legally liable for the individual shall produce evidence sufficient to prove eligibility for it.

History.

1982, c. 50, § 37.1-202.1; 1984, c. 431; 1998, c. 680; 2005, c. 716; 2012, cc. 476, 507.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 476 and 507 are identical, and substituted “an individual receiving services” for “a consumer” in the first sentence of the first and second paragraphs, and “individual” for “consumer” throughout the section.

§ 37.2-512.
Authority to enter into joint agreements.

A community services board may enter into joint agreements, pursuant to subdivision A 4 of §

37.2-504

with one or more community services boards or behavioral health authorities, to provide treatment, habilitation, or support services for individuals receiving services with specialized and complex service needs and associated managerial, operational, and administrative services and support and to promote clinical, programmatic, or administrative effectiveness and efficiency. Services may be provided under a joint agreement by one or more community services boards or behavioral health authorities or by an administrator or management body established or contracted through a joint agreement.

Participation in a joint agreement shall be voluntary and at the discretion of the community services board. No community services board shall be required to enter into a joint agreement pursuant to this section as a condition for the receipt of funds.

No joint agreement shall relieve a community services board of any obligation or responsibility imposed upon it by law, but performance under the terms of a joint agreement may be offered in satisfaction of the obligation or responsibility of the community services board.

The community services board’s participation in a joint agreement shall be described in the performance contract negotiated by the community services board and the Department pursuant to §

37.2-508

. The community services board shall provide a copy of a joint agreement to the governing body of each city or county that established the board for its review and comment at least 30 days before executing the agreement.

A joint agreement shall state or describe:

The term or duration of the joint agreement, which shall be for at least one year but may be extended annually pursuant to provisions in the joint agreement;

The purpose or purposes of the joint agreement;

The community services boards or behavioral health authorities participating in the joint agreement;

The treatment, habilitation, or support services and associated managerial and administrative services and support to be provided through the joint agreement;

The manner in which the joint agreement will be administered and any necessary actions by the participants will be coordinated;

The manner in which the joint agreement will be financed, including the proportional share to be provided by each participating community services board or behavioral health authority, and the budget, which shall be incorporated as part of the joint agreement, will be established and administered;

The manner by which state general funds, fee revenues, and other funds for the operation of the joint agreement will be received and disbursed by the participating boards or behavioral health authorities;

The manner by which activities conducted under the joint agreement will be monitored, managed, reported, and evaluated;

The permissible method or methods to be employed in accomplishing the partial or complete termination of the joint agreement and for disposing of any property acquired under the joint agreement upon such partial or complete termination; and

Any other matters that are necessary and proper for the effective operation of the joint agreement.

The joint agreement, in addition to the items enumerated in subsection E, may contain the following items.

The joint agreement may provide for an administrator or management body that shall be responsible for administering activities conducted under the joint agreement. The organization, term, powers, and duties of any administrator or management body shall be specified in the joint agreement. This administrator or management body may be given authority through the joint agreement to employ staff and obtain services provided under the joint agreement though contracts on behalf of the community services boards or behavioral health authorities that have entered into the joint agreement. This administrator or management body shall defend or compromise, as appropriate, all claims, suits, actions, or proceedings arising from its performance under this joint agreement and shall obtain and maintain insurance sufficient for this purpose.

The joint agreement may specify the manner of acquiring, holding, and disposing of real and personal property required for or used in activities conducted under the joint agreement.

The joint agreement may describe how issues of liability will be handled and the types, amounts, and limits of any liability insurance coverage, including whether such coverage will be obtained through the Department of Treasury’s Division of Risk Management program pursuant to §

2.2-1839

or otherwise.

Any community services board entering into a joint agreement pursuant to this section may provide funds or property, personnel, or services to the administrator or management body responsible for administering activities conducted under this joint agreement that may be within its legal powers to sell, lease, give, or otherwise supply.

The community services boards or behavioral health authorities entering into a joint agreement pursuant to this section may create an administrator or management body to provide treatment, habilitation or support services on behalf of the participating community services boards or behavioral health authorities subject to the following conditions.

The administrator or management body created pursuant to this subsection shall operate under contract with the participating community services boards or behavioral health authorities, and this contract shall be exempt from the requirements of the Virginia Public Procurement Act, (§

2.2-4300

et seq.).

The administrator or management body created pursuant to this subsection shall be subject to all statutory and regulatory requirements that apply to community services boards, including procurement, employment, Virginia Freedom of Information Act, disclosure and confidentiality of individual service and administrative records, data collection and reporting, and all other aspects of their business and services.

The administrator or management body created pursuant to this subsection shall have the authority to receive funds from participating community services boards or behavioral health authorities; public and private sources such as foundations, gifts and grants; and public and private reimbursement from private insurers and the Department of Medical Assistance Services; but the administrator or management body shall not be authorized to receive funds directly from the Department.

The administrator or management body created pursuant to this subsection shall defend or compromise, as appropriate, all claims, suits, actions, or proceedings arising from its performance under this joint agreement and shall obtain and maintain insurance sufficient for this purpose.

History.

2006, c. 656; 2012, cc. 476, 507.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 476 and 507 are identical, and substituted “individuals receiving services” for “consumers” in the subsection A and “confidentiality of individual service” for “confidentiality of consumer” in subdivision H 2.